Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.580

Off-street parking space and facilities—Operation—Lease.

Such towns are authorized to establish the methods of operation of off-street parking space and/or facilities by ordinance, which may include leasing or municipal operation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.580. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 4.]